Connecticut, session 2026, HB05328.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
working group to address anti-Muslim and anti-Arab racism in public
schools. The working group shall develop guidance and resources to
address issues relating to anti-Muslim and anti-Arab racism that affect
students, families, educators and school personnel. Such guidance and
resources may include, but need not be limited to, (1) suggested
amendments to school district policies to ensure that all students,
educators and school personnel feel safe inside and outside of the school
setting, (2) recommended training relating to anti-Muslim and anti-
Arab racism for educators and administrators, and (3) guidance in the
creation or provision of curriculum materials and resources relating to
Islamic and Arab studies, pursuant to the provisions of section 10-16b
of the general statutes, and genocide education and awareness,
pursuant to the provisions of section 10-18f of the general statutes,
including, but not limited to, the history, heritage, contributions and
persecution of Muslim communities.
(b) The working group shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5328
one of whom shall be a school administrator with expertise and
knowledge in developing and implementing curricula in public schools
in the state, and one of whom shall be a representative of the
Connecticut chapter of the Muslim Justice Center;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate, one of
whom shall have knowledge and national and local expertise and
experience in developing innovative and collaborative resources to
address anti-Muslim and anti-Arab racism in elementary and secondary
schools, and one of whom shall be a representative of the Connecticut
chapter of Muslim Advocacy for Rights, Unity and Fairness;
(3) Two appointed by the majority leader of the House of
Representatives, who shall be teachers with professional knowledge
and proven experience in addressing and combatting anti-Muslim or
anti-Arab racism in public schools, one of whom shall be a member of
the American Federation of Teachers-Connecticut and one of whom
shall be a member of the Connecticut Education Association;
(4) Two appointed by the majority leader of the Senate, who shall be
faculty members of an institution of higher education with expertise in
curriculum development and knowledge and experience in addressing
anti-Muslim and anti-Arab racism and teaching Muslim heritage, one of
whom shall be a member of the Congress of Connecticut Community
Colleges, SEIU Local 1973, and one of whom shall be a member of the
Connecticut State Conference of the American Association of University
Professors;
(5) Two appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives, one of whom shall have experience in school
administration and expertise in addressing and combatting anti-Muslim
and anti-Arab racism in public schools, and one of whom shall be a
parent of a Muslim student in the state;
(6) Two appointed by the minority leader of the Senate, one of whom
shall have professional experience addressing anti-Muslim and anti-
Arab racism in the state, and one of whom shall be a Muslim student in
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5328
the state;
(7) Two appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be a
representative of the Connecticut chapter of the Council on American
Islamic Relations, and one of whom shall be a representative of the
Muslim Coalition of Connecticut;
(8) The executive director of the Connecticut Association of Boards of
Education, or the executive director's designee;
(9) The executive director of the Connecticut Association of Public
School Superintendents, or the executive director's designee;
(10) The president of the Connecticut Education Association, or the
president's designee; and
(11) The Commissioner of Education, or the commissioner's designee.
(c) All initial appointments to the working group shall be made not
later than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority.
(d) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president
pro tempore of the Senate shall each select a cochairperson of the
working group from among the members of the working group. Such
cochairpersons shall jointly schedule the first meeting of the working
group, which shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective
date of this section.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to education
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit the
guidance and resources developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section and any recommendations for legislation to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to education, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5328
of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4